Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Wyoming Health Insurance Pool Act

§ 26-43-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Account” means the account provided by W.S.

26-43-112

;

“Administrator” means the insurer, insurers or third party administrator or administrators selected pursuant to W.S. 26-43-104(a) to administer the pool;

“Board” means the board of directors of the pool;

“Commissioner” means the insurance commissioner;

“Department” means the insurance department;

“Health insurance” means any public health benefit plan, private health benefit plan, hospital and medical expense incurred policy, Medicare supplement policy, nonprofit health care service plan contract and health maintenance organization subscriber contract. The term does not include any hospital or medical service plan which by contract or product design is intended to provide coverage for six (6) months or less, fixed indemnity, limited benefit or credit insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising from a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance;

“Health maintenance organization” means as defined by W.S.

26-34-102

;

“Hospital” means a facility licensed as a hospital by the department of health;

“Insurance arrangement” means any plan, program, contract or any other arrangement under which one (1) or more employers, unions or other organizations provide to their employees or members, either directly or indirectly through a trust or third party administrator, health care services or benefits other than through an insurer. For purposes of assessments under this act “insurance arrangement” does not include any plan, program, contract or other arrangement under which the state of Wyoming, its political subdivisions or school districts provide health care services or benefits pursuant to the authority granted under W.S.

9-3-201

;

“Insured” means any individual resident of this state who is eligible to receive benefits from any insurer or insurance arrangement;

“Insurer” means any insurance company authorized to transact disability insurance business in this state, Medicare supplement insurance issuer, health maintenance organization or health service plan operation under W.S.

26-22-301

;

“Medicare” means coverage under both Part A and B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.;

“Member” means all insurers and insurance arrangements participating in the pool;

“Plan of operation” means the plan of operation of the pool, including articles, bylaws and operating rules adopted by the board pursuant to W.S.

26-43-102

;

“Pool” means the Wyoming health insurance pool created by W.S.

26-43-102

;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

“Creditable coverage” means, with respect to an individual, coverage of the individual provided under any private health benefit plan or public health benefit plan;

“Federally defined eligible individual” means an individual:

For whom, as of the date on which the individual seeks coverage under this act, the aggregate of the periods of creditable coverage, is eighteen (18) or more months;

Whose most recent prior creditable coverage was under a group private or public health benefit plan;

Who is not eligible for coverage under a group health plan, part A or part B of Medicare or Medicaid, and who does not have other health insurance coverage;

With respect to whom the most recent coverage within the period of aggregate creditable coverage was not terminated based on a factor relating to nonpayment of premiums or fraud;

Who, if offered the option of continuation coverage under a COBRA continuation provision or under a similar state program, elected such coverage; and

Who has exhausted such continuation coverage under such provision or program, if the individual elected the continuation coverage described in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph.

“Eligibility level” means a percentage of the federal poverty guideline for level of coverage under the plan of operation;

“This act” means W.S.

26-43-101

through

26-43-114

.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-101

; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1994, ch. 18, § 1; 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 2007, ch. 202, § 2; 2019 ch. 16, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(xix) and redesignated the existing paragraph accordingly; in present (a)(xx), substituted “26-43-114” for “26-43-113.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 16, §
1, in (a)(vi), added "Medicare supplement policy," in the first sentence; in (a)(xi) added "Medicare supplement insurance issuer,"; in (a)(xviii)(C) substituted "Medicare" for "title XVIII of the Social Security Act,".

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 16, §
2, repealed former (a)(xvi), which read: " “Alternative plan” means the health care plan developed pursuant to W.S. 26-43-106(b)(ii) to meet the state implemented acceptable alternative mechanism pursuant to section 2744 of the federal Public Health Service Act as defined in P.L. 104-191.;".

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section 2744 of P.L. 104-191, referred to in (a)(xvi), may be found at 42 U.S.C.S. § 300gg-44.

§ 26-43-102.
Operation of the pool; board membership; board powers and duties.

There is created a nonprofit entity known as the Wyoming health insurance pool. All insurers issuing health insurance in this state and to the extent not preempted by federal law, insurance arrangements providing health plan benefits in this state on and after July 1, 1990, are members of the pool. The commissioner shall give notice to all member insurers and insurance arrangements of the time and place for the initial meeting of the board appointed pursuant to W.S. 26-43-102(b).

The board shall consist of seven (7) members including the commissioner or his designated representative. The commissioner shall appoint three (3) members from participating insurers and three (3) members from the general public. Terms of office for the appointed board members are four (4) years except initial terms shall be less than four (4) years and staggered as determined by the commissioner. The commissioner shall establish procedures for filling vacancies on the board.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall receive travel expenses and per diem from pool funds in the same manner and amount as state employees for services incurred for the board.

The board shall:

Select an administrator of the pool;

Submit to the commissioner a plan of operation for the pool and any amendments to the plan necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable and equitable administration of the pool. The commissioner shall approve the plan of operation after notice and hearing provided the plan is determined suitable to assure the fair, reasonable and equitable administration of the pool and provides for the sharing of pool gains or losses on an equitable proportionate basis. The plan of operation is effective upon approval in writing by the commissioner. If the board at any time thereafter fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the commissioner shall adopt reasonable rules after notice and hearing as necessary or advisable to effectuate the provisions of this section. The rules shall continue in force until modified by the commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by the board and approved by the commissioner;

Have the general powers and authority granted under the laws of this state to insurance companies licensed to transact health insurance;

Establish for each eligibility level appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments, expense allowances, agents’ referral fees, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates and rate schedules may be adjusted for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation in claim cost and shall take into consideration appropriate risk factors in accordance with established actuarial and underwriting practices;

Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions of this act;

Issue policies of insurance in accordance with the requirements of this act;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

The plan of operation provided by paragraph (d)(ii) of this section shall:

Establish procedures for the handling, investing and accounting of assets and monies of the pool;

Identify the administrator in accordance with W.S.

26-43-104

;

Establish procedures for the collection of assessments to provide for claims paid under the plan and for administrative expenses incurred or estimated to be incurred during the period for which the assessments are made;

Establish the level of assessment payments pursuant to W.S.

26-43-105

;

Develop and implement a program to publicize and to maintain public awareness of the existence of the plan, the eligibility requirements and procedures for enrollment;

Establish procedures for termination of pool coverage of any person who ceases to meet the eligibility requirements provided by W.S.

26-43-103

;

Provide as necessary for audits of the pool and the administration of the pool;

Allow every insurance agent licensed to sell insurance in Wyoming to sell the policy.

The board may:

Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and purposes of this act, including but not limited to the authority, with the approval of the insurance commissioner, to enter into contracts with similar pools of other states for the joint performance of common administrative functions or with persons or other organizations for the performance of administrative functions;

Sue or be sued, including but not limited to taking any legal actions necessary or proper for recovery of any assessments for, on behalf of, or against pool members;

Take legal action as necessary to avoid the payment of improper claims against the pool or the coverage provided by or through the pool;

Appoint from among members appropriate legal, actuarial and other committees as necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool, policy and other contract design and any other function within the authority of the board;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-102

; 2007, ch. 202, § 2; 2010, ch. 96, § 2; 2019 ch. 16, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “for each eligibility level” in (d)(iv).

The 2010 amendment,

added (d)(vii) and (f)(v).

Laws 2010, ch. 96 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 16, §
1, in (d)(i), deleted "the administrator within one hundred twenty (120) days of appointment of the board.
If the administrator is not selected within one hundred twenty (120) days, the commissioner shall appoint" and added "of the pool;"; in (d)(ii) deleted "fails to submit a suitable plan of operation within one hundred eighty (180) days after
appointment of the board or" to the fourth sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 16, § 2, repealed former (d)(vii), which read: "Manage the demonstration project pursuant to article 2 of this chapter."

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (d)(v), (d)(vi) and (f)(i), see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

§ 26-43-103.
Eligibility.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e) of this section, any individual person who is a resident of this state is eligible for pool coverage under eligibility level one (1) or eligibility level two (2) if evidence of the following is provided:

Rejection of or refusal to issue health insurance for health reasons by one insurer;

Refusal to issue health insurance except at a rate exceeding the applicable pool rate for the coverage applied for under the pool; or

Refusal to issue health insurance except with a reduction or exclusion of coverage for a preexisting health condition which reduction or exclusion is more restrictive than the reduction or exclusion provided by the applicable pool coverage for which application is being made.

The following persons are not eligible for pool coverage:

Persons who have coverage under health insurance or an insurance arrangement on the issue date of pool coverage;

Any person who is at the time of pool application eligible for Medicaid health care benefits or any person who is eligible for Medicare by reason of age;

Any person who terminated coverage in the pool unless twelve (12) months have elapsed from the termination date;

Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) in benefits. The board shall adjust these amounts annually to reflect the effects of inflation. The adjustment shall not be less than the annual change in the medical component of the “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers” of the department of labor, bureau of statistics, unless the board proposes and the commissioner approves a lower adjustment factor;

Inmates of public institutions;

Persons who are eligible for group health insurance or a group health insurance arrangement provided in connection with a policy, plan or program sponsored by an employer and subject to regulation as a group health plan under federal or state law, even though the employer coverage is declined, unless:

The cost to insure the individual is offered at a rate to the individual or his employed family member exceeding the applicable pool rate by at least twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) for the coverage applied for under the pool; and

At the time of enrollment, plan enrollment does not exceed ninety-five percent (95%) of maximum enrollment capacity as determined under W.S.

26-43-114

.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

For purposes of catastrophic health insurance pursuant to W.S. 26-43-106(b)(vi), in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, eligibility shall be limited to those individuals whose total household income does not exceed four hundred percent (400%) of the federal poverty level.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner shall have authority to terminate eligibility and disenroll from coverage under the pool some or all of the individuals who are enrolled in the plan as of July 1, 2015, subject to the following:

The commissioner has determined that all individuals or groups of individuals who are to be disenrolled have reasonable access to health insurance;

All individuals who are to be disenrolled shall receive prior notice of disenrollment at least ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the disenrollment;

The commissioner shall have authority to reenroll any individual or group who were disenrolled pursuant to this subsection if it is demonstrated that the individual or group cannot otherwise be insured at reasonable expense.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-103

; Laws 1992, ch. 19, § 1; 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 2005, ch. 57, § 1; 2007, ch. 202, § 2; 2009, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 95, § 1; 2015 ch. 58, § 1, effective February 26, 2015; 2019 ch. 16, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2019; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the exception at the end of (b)(i); added (b)(vi) and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “under eligibility level one (1) or eligibility level two (2)” in the introductory language in (a).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added (d).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (b)(vi), added “unless” following “coverage is declined”, and added (b)(vi)(A) and (b)(vi)(B).

While neither of the amendments gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted “subsections (b) and (e)” for “subsection”; and added (e).

Laws 2015, ch. 58, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, in (b)(iv), deleted the comma after "coverage" and "other than coverage under the alternative plan provided by the pool," in the first sentence and deleted the second sentence "For coverage under the alternative plan provided by the pool, any person on whose behalf the pool has paid five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) in benefits or a greater amount if required to meet the definition of a comprehensive level of benefits under federal regulation."

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, repealed former (c), which read: "Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any federally eligible individual who is and continues to be a resident shall be eligible for pool coverage."

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(iv) deleted “For pool coverage” at the beginning.

Alternative to HIPPA. —

A waiver the plaintiff signed excluding a preexisting medical condition from an individual health insurance policy was valid and enforceable, notwithstanding endorsements adopted to conform her policy to provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), 42 U.S.C.S. § 300gg et seq., namely the Group Market requirement that does not permit exclusions permanently denying coverage of a preexisting medical condition, because Wyoming has an alternative mechanism, as required by the Act; under the Wyoming Health Insurance Risk Pool (WHIP) coverage is provided for persons who have been denied coverage for preexisting conditions.O'Donnell v. Blue Cross Blue Shield, 2003 WY 112, 76 P.3d 308,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2003).

Duty of insurer. —

An insurance company's duty of good faith and fair dealing, did not require it to inform an insured about the possibility of coverage under this section.O'Donnell v. Blue Cross Blue Shield, 2003 WY 112, 76 P.3d 308,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 26-43-104.
Administrator.

The board shall select an insurer, insurers or a third party administrator or administrators through a competitive bidding process to administer the pool. The board shall evaluate bids based on criteria established by the board which shall include but are not limited to:

The proven ability of the administrator to handle individual accident and health insurance;

The efficiency of the claim paying procedures of the administrator;

An estimate of total charges for administering the plan;

The ability of the administrator to administer the pool in a cost efficient manner.

The administrator shall serve for a period determined by the board of not less than three (3) years and not more than five (5) years and is subject to removal for cause. At least one (1) year prior to the expiration of the period of service by an administrator, the board shall invite all insurers, including the current administrator to submit bids to serve as the administrator for the succeeding period. Selection of the administrator for the succeeding period shall be made at least six (6) months prior to the end of the current period.

The administrator shall:

Perform all eligibility and administrative claims payment functions relating to the pool;

Establish a premium billing procedure for collection of premiums from insureds. Billings shall be made periodically as determined by the board;

Perform all necessary functions to assure timely payment of benefits to covered persons under the pool including but not limited to:

Making available information relating to the proper manner of submitting a claim for benefits to the pool and distributing forms upon which submission is made;

Evaluating the eligibility of each claim for payment by the pool.

Submit regular reports to the board regarding the pool operation. The board shall determine the frequency, content and form of the report;

Determine net written and earned premiums, the expense of administration and the paid and incurred losses for the year and report the information to the board and the department on a form and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner;

Receive payment as provided in the plan of operation for its expenses incurred in the performance of its services.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-104

.

§ 26-43-105.
Assessments; premium tax credit.

After each calendar year, the administrator shall determine the pool net premiums which are premiums less administrative expense allowances, the pool administrative expenses and the pool incurred losses for the calendar year considering investment income and other appropriate gains and losses.

Each insurer’s assessment shall be determined by multiplying the total cost of pool operation by a fraction the numerator of which equals the insurer’s premium and subscriber contract charges for health insurance written in the state during the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which equals the total of all premiums, subscriber contract charges written in the state and to the extent not preempted by federal law, one hundred ten percent (110%) of all claims paid by insurance arrangements in the state during the preceding calendar year. To the extent not preempted by federal law, each insurance arrangement’s assessment shall be determined by multiplying the total cost of pool operation by a fraction the numerator of which equals one hundred ten percent (110%) of the benefits paid by the insurance arrangement on behalf of insureds in this state during the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which equals the total of all premiums, subscriber contract charges and one hundred ten percent (110%) of all benefits paid by insurance arrangements made on behalf of insureds in the state during the preceding calendar year. Health insurance premiums and benefits paid by an insurance arrangement that are less than an amount determined by the board to justify the cost of collection shall not be considered for purposes of determining assessments. To the extent not preempted by federal law, insurance arrangements shall report to the board on an annual basis on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Members shall file with the board annual reports and other reports deemed necessary by the board to determine each member’s proportion of participation.

On or before March 1 of each year, the board shall determine each member’s proportion of participation in the pool for the calendar year based on annual statements and other reports deemed necessary by the board and filed by the member with the board. Any deficit incurred by the pool shall be recouped by assessments apportioned under subsection (b) of this section by the board among members. Notification of assessments shall be mailed by the board not later than March 1 of each year. Assessments are due and payable within thirty (30) days after receipt of the assessment notice.

For the total amount of assessments due from all members in any one (1) calendar year pursuant to this section up to four million dollars ($4,000,000.00), eighty percent (80%) of each member’s proportionate contribution to the first two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) and fifty percent (50%) of the next two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be allowed as a credit against any premium tax owed by the member under this code in the year for which the assessment is payable. The board shall not make a total assessment against all members of more than six million dollars ($6,000,000.00) in any one (1) fiscal year. Assessments received shall be used to defray the total cost of level one (1) pool operations first. Assessment amounts not required to support level one (1) pool operations will be used to support level two (2) operations before any general fund appropriation is used. The general fund appropriation shall only be used to support level two (2) operations. The board shall ensure that all expenses directly attributable to level one (1) individuals are paid from premiums, assessments and any withdrawals from previous reserves.

The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the ability of the member to fulfill its contractual obligations. In the event an assessment against a member is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which the assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The member receiving an abatement or deferment shall remain liable to the pool for the deficiency for four (4) years.

If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the pool, the excess shall be paid to the state treasurer, credited to the account and used by the board to offset future losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this subsection, “future losses” includes reserves for incurred but unreported claims.

The board may require initial and interim assessments as reasonable and necessary for the organizational, administrative and interim operating expenses and to pay claims in excess of premiums collected. Any initial or interim assessments shall be credited as offsets against any regular assessments due following the close of the calendar year.

Assessments collected pursuant to this act shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited to the account.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-105

; Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 2007, ch. 202, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (d), substituted “four million dollars ($4,000,000.00),” for “two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00),”
substituted “two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)” for “one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000.00)” twice, and added the last four sentences.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (h), see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

§ 26-43-106.
Minimum benefits; limitations.

Pool coverage shall be offered to eligible persons subject to the termination and disenrollment provisions of W.S 26-43-103(e). The commissioner shall establish by rule and regulation the pool coverage, its schedule of benefits, exclusions and other limitations consistent with this act and taking into consideration the advice and recommendations of the board. The commissioner and the board annually shall review the pool coverage, its schedule of benefits, exclusions and limitations and make changes to reflect the levels of health insurance coverage provided in this state.

In establishing the pool coverage, the commissioner shall:

Consider the levels of health insurance provided in the state, medical economic factors deemed appropriate and the advice and recommendations of the board;

Promulgate benefit levels, deductibles, coinsurance factors, exclusions and limitations determined to be generally reflective of and commensurate with health insurance plans marketed in the state and required by this act. The commissioner shall offer at least two (2) plans that may include a higher deductible option or a health savings account option in order to provide less expensive coverage alternatives for pool participants;

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 57, § 2.

Design and employ cost containment measures and controls which may include but are not limited to, preadmission certification, concurrent inpatient review, case management, utilization reviews, exclusions or limitations concerning treatment and services, and member deductibles;

Offer for those individuals described in W.S. 26-43-103(d) a catastrophic health plan having a deductible level of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), subject to the termination and disenrollment provisions of W.S. 26-43-103(e).

Pool coverage shall not include medical costs associated with:

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

Cosmetic surgery;

Other procedures as determined by the board.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-106

; Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 2005, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 15, § 1; 2019 ch. 16, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2019; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (b)(ii); and repealed former (b)(iii), pertaining to pool coverage other than under the alternative plan, and former (b)(iv), pertaining to pool coverage under the alternative plan.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (b)(vi).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 16, §
1, in (a), substituted "Pool" for "Major medical expense" and added "subject to the termination and disenrollment provisions of W.S 26-43-103(e)." in the first sentence; in (b)(ii) deleted the second sentence "The commissioner shall also establish benefit levels, deductibles, coinsurance factors, exclusions and limitations for alternative plan coverage under the pool meeting the requirements of this act and the requirements for an acceptable alternative
mechanism under section 2744 of the federal Public Health Service Act as defined in P.L. 104-191." and substituted "T" for "For both categories of coverage, in the third sentence; in (b)(vi) added "), subject to the termination and disenrollment provisions of W.S 26-43-103(e)."; in (c) deleted ", except for coverage under the alternative plan".

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 16, §
2, repealed former (c)(i), which read: "Organ transplants"; and repealed former (d), which read: "Coverage under the alternative plan shall not include medical costs associated with: (i) Cosmetic surgery; (ii) Other procedures as determined by the board in developing the alternative plan pursuant to W.S. 26-43-106(b)(ii)."

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and the health benefits plan committee created pursuant to W.S.

26-2-132

” at the end of the second sentence of (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a) and in subsection (b)(ii), see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

Editor's notes. —

Section 2744 of P.L. 104-191 may be found at 42 U.S.C.S. § 300gg-44.

§ 26-43-107.
Premiums; standard risk rate.

Separate schedules of premium rates based on plan coverage under the pool, age, sex and geographical location may apply for individual risks.

The board shall determine the standard risk rate by calculating the average individual standard rate charged by the five (5) largest insurers offering coverages in the state comparable to each plan coverage under the pool. If five (5) insurers do not offer comparable coverage, the standard risk rate shall be established using reasonable actuarial techniques and shall reflect anticipated experience and expenses for the applicable coverage.

Initial rates for pool coverage in the first year coverage is provided pursuant to this act shall not be less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of rates established as applicable for individual standard risks. Subsequent rates may provide for the expected costs of claims including recovery of prior losses, expenses of operation, investment income of claim reserves, and any other costs factors subject to the limitations provided by this subsection. Beginning July 1, 2007, except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, there shall be two (2) levels of eligibility. Level one (1) eligibility applies to persons with income equal to or greater than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty guideline. Level two (2) eligibility applies to persons with income below two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty guideline. Premium rates for level one (1) eligibility shall be set at one hundred fifty percent (150%) to two hundred five percent (205%) of rates applicable to individual standard risks. Premium rates for level two (2) eligibility shall be set at one hundred percent (100%) to one hundred forty percent (140%) of rates applicable to individual standard risks. All rates and rate schedules shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval. The rates shall be set as close as practical to the lower end of the range provided.

Premiums collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited to the account.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 2.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-107

; Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1, ch. 57 § 1; 2005, ch. 57, § 1; 2007, ch. 202, § 2; 2013 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 16, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (c).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (c) inserting the clarification of (2)
levels of eligibility to begin July 1, 2007, inserting premium rates for level (2) eligibility, and deleted “by this subsection without undue risk of shifting more than fifty percent (50%) of the burden of assessments to private health insurance” following “range provided” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “except as provided in subsection (e) of this section” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence in (c); and added (e).

The 2019 Amendments.–

The first 2019 amendment, in (c), substituted "two hundred five percent (205%)" for "two hundred percent (200%)" in the sixth sentence and "one hundred forty percent (140%)" for "one hundred thirty-five percent (135%)" in the seventh sentence, deleted the last sentence "For the period July 1, 2013 through June 30, 2015, premium rates shall be as provided in subsection (e) of this section."

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, repealed former (e), which read: "For the period July 1, 2013 through June 30, 2015, premium rates shall be the rates in effect on January 1, 2013, except the board may adjust those rates to reflect increases in the cost of claims and expenses."

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (c), see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

§ 26-43-108.
Preexisting conditions.

Pool coverage shall not exclude charges or expenses incurred for longer than the first twelve (12) months following the effective date of coverage as to any condition for which during the six (6) month period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage medical advice, care or treatment was recommended or received. The preexisting coverage limitation set forth in this section shall not apply to a federally defined eligible individual.

Preexisting condition exclusions shall be waived to the extent to which similar exclusions, if any, have been satisfied under any prior health insurance coverage which was terminated and coverage in the pool is effective from the date on which the prior coverage was terminated if application for pool coverage is made not later than ninety (90) days following the termination.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-108

; Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1.

§ 26-43-109.
Benefit payments reduction.

Benefits otherwise payable under pool coverage are reduced by:

All amounts paid or payable through any other health insurance or insurance arrangement;

All hospital and medical expense benefits paid or payable under any workers’ compensation coverage or automobile medical payment or liability insurance whether provided on the basis of fault or nonfault; and

Any hospital or medical benefits paid or payable under or provided pursuant to any state or federal law or program except Medicaid.

The administrator or the board has a cause of action against an eligible person for the recovery of the amount of benefits paid which are not for covered expenses. Benefits due from the pool may be reduced or refused as a setoff against any amount recoverable under this section.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-109

.

§ 26-43-110.
Immunity.

The participation in the pool as members, the establishment of rates, forms or procedures or any other joint or collective action required by this act shall not be the basis of any legal action, criminal or civil liability or penalty against the board, the pool or pool members.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-110

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

§ 26-43-111.
Tax exemption.

The pool established pursuant to this act is exempt from insurance premium taxes.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-111

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

§ 26-43-112.
Account created; payments; investment.

There is created an account within the trust and agency fund in which all money received, earned or collected pursuant to this act shall be credited and continuously appropriated for the purposes of this act. All claims, costs of administration and other necessary expenses incurred pursuant to this act shall be paid from the account. All money in the account not immediately necessary for the purposes of this act, which amount is certified by the board to the state treasurer, shall be invested and any interest earned shall be credited to the account.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-112

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).